Florida, session 2026, SB1746.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âFlorida Consumer 22 Privacy Act.â 23 Section 2.âSection 501.003, Florida Statutes, is created to 24 read: 25 501.003âFlorida Consumer Privacy Act.â 26 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 27 (a)ââCollects,â âcollected,â or âcollectionâ means buying, 28 renting, gathering, obtaining, receiving, or accessing any 29 personal information relating to a consumer by any means. The 30 term includes receiving information from the consumer, either 31 actively or passively, or by observing the consumerâs behavior. 32 (b)ââConsumerâ means an individual who obtains, maintains, 33 uses, purchases, leases, or receives goods, services, real 34 property, or personal property or the representative of such 35 individual. 36 (c)ââCovered informationâ means aggregate personal 37 information. 38 (d)ââPersonal informationâ means information that 39 identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of 40 being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly 41 or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household. 42 1.âThe term includes, but is not limited to, the following 43 if it identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable 44 of being associated with, or could be reasonably linked, 45 directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household: 46 a.âAn identifier such as a real name, an alias, a postal 47 address, a unique personal identifier, an online identifier, an 48 Internet Protocol address, an e-mail address, an account name, a 49 username, a social security number, a driver license number, a 50 passport number, a customer identifier, an advertising 51 identifier, or other similar identifier. 52 b.âCommercial information, including records of personal 53 property, products or services purchased, obtained, or 54 considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or 55 tendencies. 56 c.âBiometric data, health information, or genetic 57 information. 58 d.âInternet or other electronic network activity 59 information, including, but not limited to, browsing history, 60 search history, cookies, and information regarding a consumerâs 61 interaction with a website, an application, a product, or an 62 advertisement, whether obtained directly or through a third 63 party. 64 e.âGeolocation data, including, but not limited to, data 65 tracked from a global positioning system or environmental 66 information about that location, such as a fire or storm that 67 may indicate heightened consumer needs based on an emergency 68 situation, not including cost differences based on objective and 69 uniformly applied shipping costs, or any applicable taxes or 70 tariffs for various locations. 71 f.âAudio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or 72 similar information. 73 g.âProfessional or employment-related information. 74 h.âHardware information or hardware state of the online 75 device, such as battery life, the number of wireless 76 connections, device age, or similar data, including increasing 77 the price based on the payment information, such as the use of a 78 specific debit or credit card, virtual wallet, bank transaction, 79 such as a wire transfer or automated clearing house, or other 80 payment, unless the price difference is based on a specific 81 objective and uniformly applied transaction fee, which can vary 82 based on the costs associated with the transaction. This sub 83 subparagraph does not prohibit the generation of a price offered 84 to a consumer based on the hardware or hardware state of the 85 online device for repairs or maintenance of the online device or 86 for calculating a trade-in value of the online device. 87 i.âInferences drawn from or actual data collected about any 88 of the information identified in this subparagraph to create a 89 profile about a consumer reflecting the consumerâs preferences, 90 characteristics, psychological trends, predispositions, 91 behavior, attitudes, intelligence, abilities, and aptitudes. 92 2.âThe term does not include: 93 a.âPublicly available information or lawfully obtained, 94 truthful information that is a matter of public concern. 95 b.âConsumer information that is deidentified or aggregate 96 consumer information, such as information used for advertising 97 or other targeted marketing, but only if the pricing does not 98 vary between consumers. 99 (e)ââSurveillance pricingâ means offering or setting a 100 personalized price for a good or service for a specific consumer 101 or group of consumers based, in whole or in part, on covered 102 information collected through any targeted pricing technologies, 103 such as electronic or any other surveillance method. The term 104 includes the use of technological methods, systems, or tools, 105 including sensors, cameras, device tracking, biometric 106 monitoring, cookies, or other forms of observation or data 107 collection that are capable of gathering covered information 108 about consumer behavior, characteristics, location, or other 109 personal attributes, whether in physical or digital 110 environments, including external or virtual attributes such as 111 user hardware and payment methods. Surveillance pricing also 112 includes dynamic pricing whereby a party engages in price fixing 113 to adjust product prices in real time based on market demands, 114 competitor prices, inventory levels, customer behavior, or other 115 factors a person may use to determine or set prices for a 116 product. 117 (2)(a)âNotwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person 118 may not engage in any act of surveillance pricing to charge, 119 offer, or accept payment of an increased price for goods or 120 services. 121 (b)âThis subsection does not apply to a refusal to extend 122 credit on specific terms, such as credit cards, personal loans, 123 and mortgages, or a refusal to enter into a transaction with a 124 specific consumer, based primarily on information contained in a 125 consumer report in accordance with the federal Fair Credit 126 Reporting Act. 127 (3)(a)âA person does not engage in surveillance pricing in 128 violation of paragraph (2)(a) if: 129 1.âThe difference in price is based solely on objective 130 costs associated with providing the good or service to different 131 consumers, such as zip codes, which can cause shipping or tax 132 cost variations. 133 2.âA discounted price is offered based on publicly 134 disclosed eligibility criteria, including, but not limited to, 135 signing up for a mailing list, registering for promotional 136 communications, or participating in a promotional event, or the 137 use of or access to forms of payment, such as credit or debit 138 cards, online wallets, or other accepted forms of payment. 139 3.âA discounted price is offered to members of a broadly 140 defined group, including, but not limited to, teachers, 141 veterans, senior citizens, or students, based on publicly 142 disclosed eligibility criteria. 143 4.âA discounted price is offered through a loyalty, 144 membership, or rewards program in which consumers affirmatively 145 enroll. 146 5.âThe pricing analysis is being conducted by an insurer 147 complying with the Florida Insurance Code, or a credit analyst 148 in compliance with the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act. 149 (b)âThe discounted price offered in subparagraph (a)2., 150 subparagraph (a)3., or subparagraph (a)4. must comply with the 151 following: 152 1.âThe eligibility criteria, available discounts, and any 153 conditions for receiving or earning the discount or reward shall 154 be clearly and conspicuously disclosed before any covered 155 information is collected. 156 2.âThe discount or reward shall be offered uniformly to all 157 consumers who meet the disclosed eligibility criteria. 158 (c)âAny covered information collected pursuant to this 159 subsection shall be used solely for the purpose of offering or 160 administering the applicable discount, cost-based pricing, or 161 loyalty program and may not be used for any other purpose, 162 including profiling, targeted advertising, or individualized 163 price setting. 164 (4)âA person who knowingly advertises, promotes, labels, or 165 publishes a statement, display, image, offer, or announcement of 166 surveillance pricing shall include with such statement, display, 167 image, offer, or announcement a clear and conspicuous disclosure 168 that states: 169 170 THIS PRICE WAS SET BY A SURVEILLANCE METHOD USING YOUR PERSONAL 171 CONSUMER INFORMATION. 172 173 (5)(a)âThe Attorney General or any state attorney may bring 174 a civil action on behalf of the state to seek the imposition of 175 civil penalties against any person who violates this section. A 176 civil penalty not to exceed $1,500 shall be imposed for each 177 violation, with each violation constituting a separate violation 178 with respect to each consumer, worker, or transaction involved. 179 Attorney fees and costs shall be awarded to the prevailing 180 party. 181 (b)âIn addition to any other remedy available at law or in 182 equity, a person aggrieved by a violation of this section may 183 bring a civil action on behalf of a person or a group of 184 similarly situated persons to restrain further violations and to 185 recover damages, reasonable attorney fees, and costs, including 186 the greater of: 187 1.âThe amount of actual damages sustained, including 188 prejudgment interest of 8 percent per year from the date the 189 claim under this section accrued; 190 2.âA civil penalty not to exceed $1,500 for each violation, 191 with each violation constituting a separate violation with 192 respect to each consumer, worker, or transaction involved; or 193 3.âThree times the amount of actual damages sustained, if 194 it is established by clear and convincing evidence that such 195 person violating this section engaged in bad faith conduct or 196 intentionally violated this section. 197 (c)âA person who violates this section shall be required to 198 disgorge all revenues earned thereby. A prevailing plaintiff 199 shall be awarded reasonable attorney fees and costs. A court may 200 also award injunctive or declaratory relief as necessary. 201 (d)âThis subsection is cumulative to other existing 202 remedies and penalties and does not limit other remedies and 203 penalties that are available under the laws of this state or any 204 applicable federal or local law. 205 (e)âThis section, including the enforcement authority 206 granted to the Attorney General and the state attorneys of this 207 state, does not preempt or otherwise affect any other right, 208 claim, remedy, presumption, or defense available at law or in 209 equity. 210 (6)âA person may not require a consumer to waive his or her 211 rights under this section or any other rights under law or 212 refuse a consumer access to goods or services for enforcing the 213 protections under this section. Any such waiver, including, but 214 not limited to, any mandatory dispute resolution provisions or 215 contrary terms of use or service, is contrary to public policy 216 and is void. 217 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.